test/src/morphology/V-kerguetaemae59_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kergütämä: # Verb (59) kergütämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kergütämä+V+Inf/mA: kergütämä
     kergütämä+V+Inf: kergütäq
     kergütämä+V+ActPrtPrc: kergütänüq
     kergütämä+V+PssPrtPrc: kergütet
     kergütämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: kergudä
     kergütämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: kergütäs
     kergütämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: kergüdi
     kergütämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: kergüç
